Texas, session 892, HB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 161, Agricultural Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 161.003.  DUTY OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS COURT. (a) The commissioners court of each county shall cooperate with and assist the commission in protecting livestock, domestic animals, and domestic fowl from communicable diseases or pests, regardless of whether a particular disease or pests exists in the county. (b)  Each commissioners court may employ a veterinarian at the expense of the county. Any veterinarian employed is subject to approval by the commission. Sec. 161.004.  DISPOSAL OF DISEASED LIVESTOCK CARCASS. (a) A person who is the owner or caretaker of livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl that die from a disease or pest infection listed by the commission in rules adopted under Section 161.041, or who owns or controls the land on which the livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl die or on which the carcasses are found, shall dispose of the carcasses in the manner required by the commission under this section. (b)  The Texas Commission on Environmental Quality may not adopt a rule related to the disposal of livestock under this section unless the rule is developed in cooperation with and is approved by the Texas Animal Health Commission. (c)  The commission shall: (1)  determine the most effective methods of disposing of diseased or pest-infected carcasses, including methods other than burning or burial; and (2)  by rule prescribe the method or methods that a person may use to dispose of a carcass as required by Subsection (a). (d)  The commission by rule may delegate its authority under this section to the executive director. Sec. 161.007.  EXPOSURE OR INFECTION CONSIDERED CONTINUING. If a veterinarian employed by the commission determines that a communicable disease or pest exists among livestock, domestic animals, or domestic fowl or on certain premises or that livestock, domestic animals, or domestic fowl have been exposed to the agency of transmission of a communicable disease or pest, the exposure or infection is considered to continue until the commission determines that the exposure or infection has been eradicated through methods prescribed by rule of the commission. Sec. 161.009.  CONFIDENTIALITY OF BIOSECURITY AND OTHER SENSITIVE INFORMATION. (a)  Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c), information held by the commission is confidential and excepted from disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, if the information consists of or relates to a biosecurity plan, a secure food supply plan, an emergency preparedness plan, or biosecurity data that was voluntarily provided to the commission by an owner or caretaker of an animal. (b)  The commission may release information described by Subsection (a) to: (1)  the attorney general's office, for the purpose of law enforcement; (2)  the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture, for the purpose of animal health protection; (3)  the secretary of the Department of Homeland Security, for the purpose of homeland security; (4)  the Department of State Health Services, for the purpose of protecting the public health from zoonotic diseases or pests; (5)  any person, if required by a court order; (6)  a federal, state, municipal, or county emergency management authority, for the purpose of management or response to natural or man-made disasters; or (7)  any person the executive director of the commission considers appropriate, if: (A)  the executive director determines that: (i)  livestock may be threatened by a disease, agent, or pest; and (ii)  the release of the information is related to actions the commission may take in performance of its powers and duties; or (B)  the executive director determines that the release of the information is necessary for emergency management purposes under Chapter 418, Government Code. (c)  The commission's release of confidential information under Subsection (b): (1)  does not affect the confidentiality of the information; (2)  is not an offense under Section 552.352, Government Code; and (3)  is not a voluntary disclosure for purposes of Section 552.007, Government Code. Sec. 161.041.  DISEASE CONTROL.  (a)  The commission shall protect all livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, and exotic fowl from diseases or pests the commission determines require control or eradication.  The commission shall adopt and periodically update rules listing the diseases or pests that require control or eradication by the commission. Section 2001.0045, Government Code, does not apply to rules adopted under this subsection. (b)  The commission may act to eradicate or control any disease, [or] agent of transmission for any disease, or pest that affects livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl, regardless of whether the disease is communicable, even if the agent of transmission is an animal species that is not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission. The commission may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection, including rules concerning testing, movement, inspection, and treatment. (c)  A person commits an offense if the person knowingly fails to handle, in accordance with rules adopted by the commission, livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl: (1)  infected with a disease or pest listed by the commission by rule under Subsection (a); (2)  exposed, as defined by commission rule, to a disease or pest listed by the commission by rule under Subsection (a) if the commission has notified the person that the animal was exposed to the disease or pest; or (3)  subject to a testing requirement due to a risk of exposure, as defined by commission rule, to a specific disease or pest if the commission has notified the person of the testing requirement. (d)  A person commits an offense if the person knowingly fails to identify or refuses to permit an agent of the commission to identify, in accordance with rules adopted by the commission, livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl infected with a disease or pest listed by the commission by rule under Subsection (a). (e)  An offense under Subsection (c) or (d) of this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor. (f)  In complying with this section, the commission may not infringe on or supersede the authority of any other agency of this state, including the authority of the Parks and Wildlife Department relating to wildlife.  If a conflict of authority occurs, the commission shall assume responsibility for disease or pest control efforts, but work collaboratively with the other agency to enable each agency to effectively carry out its responsibilities. (g)  The commission's authority to control or eradicate an agent of transmission that is an animal species that is not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission is limited to instances when a disease or pest that threatens livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl has been confirmed or is suspected to exist in that species and the commission determines that a serious threat to livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl exists. Sec. 161.0416.  EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT.  (a)  The commission may prepare and plan for, respond to, and aid in the recovery from disaster events that may affect livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl, including disease or pest outbreaks, hurricanes, floods, tornadoes, wildfires, and acts of terrorism. (b)  The commission may assist with local emergency management planning.  This subsection may not be construed to affect the commission's responsibility under any other law, including Chapter 418, Government Code, or any responsibility delegated to the commission by an emergency management authority of this state. Sec. 161.0417.  AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL FOR DISEASE OR PEST CONTROL.  (a)  A person, including a veterinarian, must be authorized by the commission in order to engage in an activity that is part of a state or federal disease or pest control or eradication program for animals. (b)  The commission shall adopt rules for the authorization of a person described by Subsection (a). (c)  The commission may, after reasonable notice, suspend or revoke a person's authorization under Subsection (a) if the commission determines that the person has substantially failed to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. (d)  A person is entitled to a hearing before the commission or a hearing examiner appointed by the commission before the commission may revoke the person's authorization under Subsection (a). The commission shall make all final decisions to suspend or revoke an authorization. (e)  This section does not affect the requirement for a license or an exemption under Chapter 801, Occupations Code, to practice veterinary medicine. Sec. 161.043.  REGULATION OF EXHIBITIONS. The commission may regulate the entry of livestock, domestic animals, and domestic fowl into exhibitions, shows, and fairs and may require treatment or certification of those animals as reasonably necessary to protect against communicable diseases or pests. Sec. 161.044.  REGULATION OF LIVESTOCK MOVEMENT FROM STOCKYARDS OR RAILWAY SHIPPING PENS. The commission may regulate the movement of livestock out of stockyards or railway shipping pens and require treatment or certification of those animals as reasonably necessary to protect against communicable diseases or pests. Sec. 161.0525.  MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING ON COOPERATION WITH OTHER STATES. The commission by rule, subject to approval by the governor, may adopt a joint memorandum of understanding with another state that includes provisions under which the commission and the other state may provide assistance to each other in the case of an animal disease outbreak or pest infestation. Sec. 161.054.  REGULATION OF MOVEMENT OF ANIMALS; EXCEPTION. (a) As a control measure, the commission by rule may regulate the movement of animals, including feral swine. The commission may restrict the intrastate movement of animals, including feral swine, even though the movement of the animals is unrestricted in interstate or international commerce. The commission may require testing, vaccination, or another epidemiologically sound procedure before or after animals are moved. (b)  The commission by rule may prohibit or regulate the movement of animals, including feral swine, into a quarantined herd, premise, or area. (c)  The commission may not adopt a rule that prohibits a person from moving animals, including feral swine, owned by that person within unquarantined contiguous lands owned or controlled by that person. (d)  On application of the owner of an animal, including a feral swine, a restriction on the movement of the animal imposed under this chapter may be modified by order of the executive director of the commission if the owner demonstrates that the restriction will result in unusual hardship for the owner. In considering an application under this section, the executive director may consider the effect of prolonged drought, inadequacy of pasturage or unusual feed supply resulting from disaster or other unforeseeable circumstances, or economic hardship. (e)  In connection with the regulation of the movement of feral swine, the commission by rule may require disease testing or pest infestation inspections before movement of a feral swine from one location to another, and establish the conditions under which feral swine may be transported. (f)  The commission's authority to regulate the movement of feral swine may not interfere with the authority of the Parks and Wildlife Department to regulate the hunting or trapping of feral swine. Sec. 161.0542.  NOTICE OF WILDLIFE DISEASE OR PEST OUTBREAK. (a)  Notwithstanding any law restricting the disclosure of information by the commission and subject to Subsection (b), if the commission becomes aware of a wildlife disease outbreak or pest infestation on a property, the commission shall provide notice of the location and nature of the outbreak or infestation to: (1)  each owner of adjacent property; and (2)  the Parks and Wildlife Department. (b)  Subsection (a) applies only to a disease or pest that the commission has designated as reportable. Sec. 161.056.  ANIMAL IDENTIFICATION PROGRAM. (a) In order to provide for disease or pest control and enhance the ability to trace disease-infected or pest-infected animals or animals that have been exposed to disease or pests, the commission may develop and implement an animal identification program that is no more stringent than a federal animal disease or pest traceability or other federal animal identification program. (b)  Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 181, Sec. 2, eff. May 25, 2013. (c)  The commission may adopt rules to require the use of official identification as part of the animal identification program under Subsection (a) for animal disease or pest control or animal emergency management. (d)  The commission may by a two-thirds vote adopt rules to provide for an animal identification program more stringent than a program allowed by Subsection (a) only for control of a specific animal disease or for animal emergency management. (e)  Information collected by the commission under this section is exempt from the public disclosure requirements of Chapter 552, Government Code.  The commission may provide information to another person, including a governmental entity, without altering the confidential status of the information.  The commission may release information to: (1)  a person who owns or controls animals and seeks information regarding those animals, if the person requests the information in writing; (2)  the attorney general's office, for the purpose of law enforcement; (3)  the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture, for the purpose of animal health protection; (4)  the secretary of the Department of Homeland Security, for the purpose of homeland security; (5)  the Department of State Health Services, for the purpose of protecting the public health from zoonotic diseases or pests; (6)  any person, under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction; (7)  a state, municipal, or county emergency management authority, for the purpose of management or response to natural or man-made disasters; or (8)  any person the executive director of the commission considers appropriate, if the executive director determines that: (A)  livestock may be threatened by a disease, pest, agent, or pest; and (B)  the release of the information is related to actions the commission may take under this section. (f)  Notwithstanding Subsection (e), the commission shall release information collected under this section if the release is necessary for emergency management purposes under Chapter 418, Government Code. The release of information under this subsection does not alter the confidential status of the information. (g)  Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 181, Sec. 2, eff. May 25, 2013. (h)  Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 181, Sec. 2, eff. May 25, 2013. (i)  The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement and enforce this section. Sec. 161.057.  CLASSIFICATION OF AREAS. (a)  The commission by rule may prescribe criteria for classifying areas in the state for disease or pest control. The criteria must be based on sound epidemiological principles.  The commission may prescribe different control measures and procedures for areas with different classifications. (b)  The commission by rule may designate as a particular classification an area consisting of one or more counties. Sec. 161.058.  COMPENSATION OF LIVESTOCK OR FOWL OWNER. (a) The commission may pay an indemnity to the owner of livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl exposed to or infected with a disease or insect if the commission considers it necessary to eradicate the disease or pest and to dispose of the exposed, [or] diseased, or infected livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl.  The commission shall provide the owner with information regarding available state or federal indemnity funds. (b)  The commission may adopt rules for the implementation of this section, including rules governing: (1)  eligibility for compensation; (2)  amounts of compensation; and (3)  limits and restrictions on compensation. (c)  The commission may spend funds appropriated for the purpose of this section only for direct payment to owners of exposed or infected livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl. Sec. 161.061.  ESTABLISHMENT.  (a)  The commission may establish a quarantine against all or the portion of a state, territory, or country in which a disease or pest listed in rules adopted under Section 161.041 exists. (b)  A quarantine established under Subsection (a) may extend to any affected area, including a county, district, pasture, lot, ranch, farm, field, range, thoroughfare, building, stable, or stockyard pen. (c)  The commission may establish a quarantine to prohibit or regulate the movement of: (1)  any article or animal that the commission designates to be a carrier of a disease or pest listed in rules adopted under Section 161.041 or a potential carrier of one of those diseases or pest, if movement is not otherwise regulated or prohibited; and (2)  an animal into an affected area, including a county district, pasture, lot, ranch, farm, field, range, thoroughfare, building, stable, or stockyard pen. (d)  The commission by rule may delegate its authority to establish a quarantine under this section to the executive director, who shall promptly notify the members of the commission when a quarantine is established. Sec. 161.0615.  STATEWIDE OR WIDESPREAD QUARANTINE. (a) The commission may quarantine livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl in all or any part of this state as a means of immediately restricting the movement of animals potentially infected with disease or pests and shall clearly describe the territory included in a quarantine area. (b)  The commission by rule may delegate its authority to quarantine livestock, exotic livestock, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl under this section to the executive director, who shall promptly notify the members of the commission of the quarantine. (c)  The commission by rule shall prescribe the manner in which notice of a statewide or widespread quarantine under this section is to be published. Sec. 161.062.  PUBLICATION OF NOTICE. (a)  Except as provided by Section 161.0615, the commission shall give notice of a quarantine against another state, territory, or country by publishing notice in a newspaper published in Texas.  The quarantine takes effect on the date of publication.  The commission shall pay the expense of publication out of any appropriation made for office and stationery expenses of the commission. (b)  The commission shall give notice of a quarantine established within this state by publishing notice in a newspaper published in the county in which the quarantine is established, by posting notice at the courthouse door of that county, or by delivering a written notice to the owner or caretaker of the animals or places to be quarantined.  The commission may pay the expense of publication or posting out of any appropriation made for the office and stationery expenses of the commission or out of any appropriation made for the control or eradication of communicable diseases or pests of livestock.  The commissioners court of a county in which a quarantine is established may pay the expenses of publication or posting out of any available funds of the county. Sec. 161.063.  CONTENTS OF NOTICE. (a)  A quarantine notice must state the requirements and restrictions under which animals may be permitted to enter this state or to be moved from a quarantined area within this state. If the seriousness of the disease or pest infestation is sufficient to warrant prohibiting the movement of animals, the notice must state that the movement is prohibited.  The quarantine notice must state the class of persons authorized by the commission to issue certificates or permits permitting movement. (b)  A quarantine notice must state the cause for which the quarantine is established, whether for infection or for exposure. (c)  A quarantine notice must describe the area or premises quarantined in a reasonable manner that enables a person to identify the area or premises, but is not required to describe the area or premises by metes and bounds. (d)  If the quarantine regulates or prohibits the movement of a carrier or potential carrier of a disease or pest, the commission may prescribe any exceptions, terms, conditions, or provisions that the commission considers necessary or desirable to promote the objectives of this chapter or to minimize the economic impact of the quarantine without endangering those objectives or the health and safety of the public.  Any exceptions, terms, conditions, or provisions prescribed under this subsection must be stated in the quarantine notice. Sec. 161.065.  MOVEMENT FROM QUARANTINED AREA; MOVEMENT OF QUARANTINED ANIMALS. (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, a person, in violation of a quarantine, may not: (1)  move livestock, domestic animals, or domestic fowl in this state from any quarantined place in or outside this state; (2)  move quarantined livestock, domestic animals, or domestic fowl from the place in which they are quarantined; or (3)  move commodities or animals designated as disease or pest carriers or potential disease or pest carriers in this state from a quarantined place in or outside this state. (b)  The commission may provide for a written certificate or written permit authorizing the movement of commodities or animals from quarantined places or the movement of quarantined commodities or animals.  The certificate or permit must be issued by a veterinarian or other person authorized by the commission to issue a certificate or permit. Each certificate or permit must be issued in conformity with the requirements stated in the quarantine notice. (c)  If the commission finds animals that have been moved in violation of a quarantine established under this chapter or in violation of any other livestock sanitary law, the commission shall quarantine the animals until they have been properly treated, vaccinated, tested, or disposed of in accordance with the rules of the commission. Sec. 161.101.  DUTY TO REPORT.  (a)  A veterinarian, a veterinary diagnostic laboratory, or a person having care, custody, or control of an animal shall report to the commission the existence of diseases or pest listed in rules adopted by the commission among livestock, exotic livestock, bison, domestic fowl, or exotic fowl within 24 hours after diagnosis of the disease or pest.  The commission shall adopt and periodically update rules listing the diseases or pests that the commission determines require reporting under this section. Section 2001.0045, Government Code, does not apply to rules adopted under this subsection. (b)  In addition to reporting required by Subsection (a), the commission may adopt rules that require a veterinarian, a veterinary diagnostic laboratory, or a person having care, custody, or control of an animal to report the existence of a disease or pest other than bluetongue in an animal to the commission within 24 hours after diagnosis if the disease: (1)  is recognized by the United States Department of Agriculture as: (A)  a foreign animal disease; [or] (B)  a reportable animal disease; or (C)  a reportable pest; (2)  is the subject of a cooperative eradication program with the United States Department of Agriculture; (3)  is an animal disease reportable to the World Organisation for Animal Health; or (4)  is the subject of a state of emergency, as declared by the governor. (c)  The commission may adopt rules that require a veterinarian, a veterinary diagnostic laboratory, or a person having care, custody, or control of an animal to report a disease not covered by Subsection (a) or (b) if the commission determines that action to be necessary for the protection of animal health in this state. The commission shall immediately deliver a copy of a rule adopted under this subsection to the appropriate legislative oversight committees. (d)  The commission may not adopt, amend, or repeal a rule under this section unless the commission holds a public hearing on the proposed action following public notice of the hearing. Sec. 161.112.  RULES.  (a)  Following notice and public hearing, the commission shall adopt rules relating to the movement of livestock, exotic livestock, and exotic fowl from livestock markets and shall require tests, immunization, or treatment as necessary to protect against the spread of communicable diseases or pests. (b)  Following notice and public hearing, the commission may adopt rules requiring permits for moving exotic livestock and exotic fowl from livestock markets as necessary to protect against the spread of communicable diseases or pests. Sec. 161.116.  SALE OR DELIVERY OF DISEASED CATTLE. (a)  In this action, "diseased" means affected by actinobacillosis, actinomycosis, carcinoma, mastitis, or any other disease or pest infestation that renders the carcass of an animal potentially dangerous for human consumption and has been so designated by rule of the commission. (b)  Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this section, a person may not sell diseased cattle unless: (1)  the cattle are sold through a livestock market where visual examination of livestock is made by an agent of the commission or by the United States Department of Agriculture; or (2)  the cattle are sold by a recognized slaughtering establishment maintaining federal, state, or state-approved veterinary postmortem inspection. (c)  The original owner of diseased cattle may sell the cattle in violation of Subsection (b) of this section if the cattle are sold and delivered on the premises of the original owner, but the purchaser shall comply with the requirements of this section. (d)  A person may not release diseased cattle from a livestock market unless the cattle are: (1)  consigned directly to a federally approved terminal market or to a slaughtering establishment maintaining federal, state, or state-approved veterinary postmortem inspection; and (2)  accompanied by a certificate or permit issued by a representative of the commission or the United States Department of Agriculture naming the terminal market or slaughtering establishment. (e)  This section does not prevent the original owner of diseased cattle, or an agent of the owner, from voiding the sale of the cattle if the owner is not satisfied with the top bid price, but the owner shall obtain a certificate or permit under Subsection (d) of this section and shall deliver the cattle to the place specified on the certificate or permit. A person is not liable for a violation of this subsection unless the agent of the commission shows the person a list of approved establishments to which the cattle may be consigned and allows the person to select an establishment from that list. (f)  A person may not deliver or divert diseased cattle consigned under a certificate or permit issued under Subsection (d) of this section to a place other than the terminal market or slaughtering establishment named in the certificate or permit. The cattle must be delivered to the terminal market or slaughtering establishment not later than the fifth day following the day on which the certificate or permit is issued. (g)  A person may not release diseased cattle from a terminal market or slaughtering establishment to which the cattle have been consigned under a certificate or permit issued under Subsection (d) of this section except on authority of the commission. Sec. 161.135.  IMPROPER DISPOSAL OF DISEASED OR INFECTED CARCASS.  (a)  A person required to dispose of a diseased or infected carcass in accordance with Section 161.004 of this code commits an offense if the person fails to dispose of the carcass in accordance with that section. (b)  An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor for each animal carcass improperly disposed of. Sec. 161.140.  REFUSAL TO PERMIT EXAMINATION OF ANIMAL OR CARCASS. (a)  A person commits an offense if the person: (1)  refuses to allow the commission or an agent of the commission to examine an animal or all or part of an animal carcass that is owned by or possessed by the person and that the commission or agent has reason to believe is affected by a communicable disease or pest infestation; or (2)  hinders or obstructs the commission or its agent in an examination under Subdivision (1) of this subsection. (b)  An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor unless it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted under this section, in which event the offense is a Class B misdemeanor. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect September 1, 2025.